Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 759.400 is amended to read:
759.400. As used in ORS 759.400 to 759.455:
(1) “Basic telephone service”  means local exchange telecommunications service defined as basic
by rule of the Public Utility Commission.
(2) “Commercial mobile radio  service” has the meaning given that term in 47 C.F.R. 20.3.
(3) “Interconnected voice over internet protocol service” has the  meaning given the term
“interconnected VoIP service” in 47 C.F.R. 9.3.
[(2)] (4)  “Retail telecommunications service” means a telecommunications service provided for
a fee to  customers. “Retail telecommunications service” does not include a service provided by one
telecommunications carrier to another  telecommunications carrier, unless the carrier receiving the
service is the end user of the service.
[(3)] (5) “Telecommunications  carrier” means any provider of retail telecommunications services,
except a call aggregator as defined in ORS 759.680.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 759.425 is amended to read:
759.425. [(1) For purposes  of this section, “retail telecommunications service” does not include radio
communications service,  radio paging service, commercial mobile radio service, personal communi-
cations service or cellular communications service. ]
[(2)(a)] (1)(a)  The Public Utility Commission shall establish and  implement a competitively neu-
tral and nondiscriminatory universal service fund. [ Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this sub-
section,] The [ Public Utility ] commission shall :
(A) Use the universal service fund  to ensure basic telephone service is available at a reasonable
and affordable rate ; and
(B) Transfer from the universal service  fund to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for deposit in the Broadband Fund established under section 4 of  this 2020 special
session Act an amount per year that is equal to the lesser of:
(i) $5 million; or
(ii) The remainder of moneys deposited in the universal service fund that  are unobligated
after making the designation required in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1603 (SB 1603-INTRO) Page 1
(b) The commission shall designate the amount of moneys deposited annually  in the
universal service fund to be used to ensure basic telephone service. The amount  designated
under this paragraph may not exceed $28 million per year .
(c) The [ Public Utility ] commission may :
(A) Adopt rules to conform the universal service fund to section 254 of  the federal Telecom-
munications Act of 1996 [ (Public Law 104-104) ] (P.L. 104-104) , and to related regulations adopted
by the Federal Communications Commission,  to the extent that the Public Utility Commission de-
termines conforming the rules is appropriate[ .]; and
[(b)] (B)  In addition to using the universal service fund to ensure basic telephone  service, [ the
Public Utility Commission may ] use the  universal service fund to encourage broadband service
availability and to provide support to telecommunications carriers that provide  both basic telephone
service and broadband service.
[(3)(a)] (2)(a)  The [ Public Utility ] commission shall establish the  price a telecommunications
utility may charge its customers  for basic telephone service. The commission shall periodically re-
view and evaluate the status of telecommunications services in  the state and designate the services
included in basic telephone service. The commission shall periodically  review and adjust as neces-
sary the price a telecommunications utility may charge for basic telephone service.
(b) The provisions of this subsection do not apply to the basic  telephone service provided by a
telecommunications utility described in ORS 759.040.
[(4)(a)] (3)(a)  The commission shall establish a benchmark for basic  telephone service as neces-
sary for the administration and distribution of the universal  service fund. The universal service fund
shall provide explicit support to an eligible telecommunications carrier that is  equal to the differ-
ence between the cost of providing basic telephone service and  the benchmark, less any explicit
compensation received by the telecommunications carrier from  federal sources specifically used to
recover local loop costs and less any explicit support  received by the telecommunications carrier
from a federal universal service program.
(b) The commission shall periodically review the benchmark  established under paragraph (a) of
this subsection and adjust the benchmark as necessary to reflect:
(A) Changes in competition in the telecommunications industry;
(B) Changes in federal universal service support; and
(C) Other relevant factors as determined by the commission.
(c) Except for a telecommunications utility described in  ORS 759.040, the commission shall seek
to limit the difference between the price a telecommunications utility  may charge for basic tele-
phone service and the benchmark.
[(5) There is imposed on the sale  of all retail telecommunications services sold in this state a uni-
versal service surcharge. ]
(4)(a) There is imposed a universal service surcharge on the sale in this state of all:
(A) Retail telecommunications services;
(B) Retail commercial mobile radio services; and
(C) Retail interconnected voice over internet protocol services.
(b) A retail commercial mobile radio service provider shall identify the  intrastate reven-
ues subject to the universal service surcharge  based on the inverse of the percentage of
interstate revenues utilized for purposes of federal universal service contributions  or based
on any other method approved by  the Public Utility Commission. A retail commercial mobile
radio service provider may  rely upon the sourcing rules set forth in the Mobile Telecommu-
nications Sourcing Act (P.L. 106-252) to identify revenues attributable to Oregon.
(c) A retail interconnected voice over internet protocol service  provider may identify, in
accordance with federal guidelines, the intrastate revenues  subject to the universal service
surcharge based on any one of the following:
(A) The inverse of the interstate safe harbor percentage established by the Federal
Communications Commission for  interconnected voice over internet protocol service for
Enrolled Senate Bill 1603 (SB 1603-INTRO) Page 2
federal universal service contribution purposes, as the interstate safe harbor percentage may
be revised from time to time;
(B) A traffic study specific to  the interconnected voice over internet protocol service
provider that allocates revenues between federal and state jurisdictions; or
(C) Another methodology for  accurately apportioning interconnected voice over internet
protocol service revenues between federal and state jurisdictions.
(d) For any service provider subject to  the universal service surcharge that provides, to
multiple locations, shared simultaneous  voice channel capacity configured to provide local
dial in different states, the revenue subject to the surcharge shall  be only the portion of the
shared capacity in this state as identified:
(A) By information itemizing, on the  billing statements provided to customers, the
charges subject to the surcharge, as  may be identified by individual end-user location, the
total number of end users and the number of end users at each end-user location; or
(B) If information described in subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph does not exist, by the
service provider’s billing system books and records.
(e) Unless otherwise provided by the Public Utility Commission by rule, the universal service
surcharge must be a uniform  percentage of the sale of [ retail telecommunications ] services subject
to the surcharge  in an  amount sufficient to support the purposes of the universal service fund es-
tablished under subsection [ (2)] (1)  of this section, provided that the percentage  does not exceed
[8.5] six percent of the sale of [ retail telecommunications ] services  subject to the surcharge .
(f) The universal service surcharge may be listed by a telecommunications carrier  as a sep-
arate line item in billing statements provided to  customers  [ by all telecommunications carriers ],
as prescribed by the commission by rule or order. The commission may not prescribe whether,
or the manner by which, a commercial mobile radio services  provider or an interconnected
voice over internet protocol services provider may list the  surcharge in billing statements
provided to customers.
(g) A [ telecommunications carrier ] service provider required to  collect the universal service
surcharge shall :
(A) Transmit amounts collected pursuant to this section to  the commission in accordance with
a schedule adopted by the commission ; and
(B) Provide the commission with information requested by  the commission as necessary
for the commission to implement this section .
(5) The commission shall deposit moneys transmitted to the commission pursuant to [ this sub-
section] subsection (4) of this section  in the universal service fund established under subsection
[(2)] (1) of this section.
(6) The universal service fund established under subsection [ (2)] (1)  of this section is separate
and distinct from the General  Fund. The universal service fund shall consist of all universal service
surcharge moneys collected by [ telecommunications carriers ] service providers required to collect
the surcharge  and transmitted to the  commission for deposit in the universal service fund. The
universal service fund may be used only for the purposes described in this section and for  payment
of expenses incurred by the commission or a third party appointed  by the commission to administer
this section. All moneys in the universal service fund are continuously appropriated to the commis-
sion to carry out the provisions of  this section. Interest on moneys deposited in the universal ser-
vice fund shall accrue to the universal service fund.
[(7) A person that primarily provides radio communications service, radio paging  service, com-
mercial mobile radio service, personal  communications service or cellular communications service may
request designation as an eligible telecommunications carrier by the commission  for purposes of this
section if the person imposes the universal service surcharge described in subsection (5) of  this section
and transmits the moneys collected to the commission for deposit  in the universal service fund estab-
lished under subsection (2) of this section for at least  one year immediately prior to requesting the
designation.]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1603 (SB 1603-INTRO) Page 3
[(8)] (7)  A pay  telephone provider may apply to the commission, on a form developed by the
commission, for a refund of the universal  service surcharge imposed on the pay telephone provider
under subsection [ (5)] (4) of this section for the provision of pay telephone service.
(8) Nothing in  this section is intended to grant the commission the authority to impose
any requirement or condition, or to exercise any regulatory authority,  with respect to com-
mercial mobile radio services or interconnected voice over internet protocol services  other
than as expressly provided for in this section.
SECTION 3.  ORS 759.425, as amended  by section 2 of this 2020 special session Act, is amended
to read:
759.425. (1)(a) The Public Utility Commission shall establish and implement a  competitively
neutral and nondiscriminatory universal service fund. The commission shall[ :]
[(A)] use the universal  service fund to ensure basic telephone service is available at a reason-
able and affordable rate .[; and ]
[(B) Transfer from the universal service fund to the  Oregon Business Development Department for
deposit in the Broadband Fund established under section  4 of this 2020 special session Act an amount
per year that is equal to the lesser of: ]
[(i) $5 million; or ]
[(ii) The remainder of moneys  deposited in the universal service fund that are unobligated after
making the designation required in paragraph (b) of this subsection. ]
(b) The commission shall designate  the amount of moneys deposited annually in the universal
service fund to be used to ensure basic telephone service. The amount designated under this para-
graph may not exceed $28 million per year.
(c) The commission may:
(A) Adopt rules to conform  the universal service fund to section 254 of the federal Telecommu-
nications  Act  of 1996 (P.L. 104-104), and to related regulations adopted by the Federal Communi-
cations Commission, to the extent that the Public  Utility Commission determines conforming the
rules is appropriate; and
(B) In addition to using the universal service  fund to ensure basic telephone service, use the
universal service fund to encourage broadband service availability and to provide support to  tele-
communications carriers that provide both basic telephone service and broadband service.
(2)(a) The commission shall establish the  price a telecommunications utility may charge its
customers for basic telephone service. The commission shall periodically  review and evaluate the
status of telecommunications services in the state and  designate the services included in basic
telephone service. The commission shall periodically review and adjust as necessary  the price a
telecommunications utility may charge for basic telephone service.
(b) The provisions of this subsection  do not apply to the basic telephone service provided by a
telecommunications utility described in ORS 759.040.
(3)(a) The commission shall establish a benchmark for basic telephone service as  necessary for
the administration and distribution of the universal service fund. The universal service fund  shall
provide explicit support to an eligible telecommunications carrier that is  equal to the difference
between the cost of providing basic telephone service and the  benchmark, less any explicit com-
pensation received by the telecommunications carrier from federal sources specifically used to re-
cover local loop costs and less any explicit support received by  the telecommunications carrier from
a federal universal service program.
(b) The commission shall periodically review  the benchmark established under paragraph (a) of
this subsection and adjust the benchmark as necessary to reflect:
(A) Changes in competition in the telecommunications industry;
(B) Changes in federal universal service support; and
(C) Other relevant factors as determined by the commission.
(c) Except for a telecommunications utility described in  ORS 759.040, the commission shall seek
to limit the difference between the  price a telecommunications utility may charge for basic tele-
phone service and the benchmark.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1603 (SB 1603-INTRO) Page 4
(4)(a) There is imposed a universal service surcharge on the sale in this state of all:
(A) Retail telecommunications services;
(B) Retail commercial mobile radio services; and
(C) Retail interconnected voice over internet protocol services.
(b) A retail commercial mobile radio service  provider shall identify the intrastate revenues
subject to the universal service surcharge based on the inverse of  the percentage of interstate re-
venues utilized for purposes of federal universal service contributions or based on any other  method
approved by the Public Utility Commission. A retail commercial  mobile radio service provider may
rely upon the sourcing rules set forth in the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act  (P.L. 106-252)
to identify revenues attributable to Oregon.
(c) A retail interconnected voice  over internet protocol service provider may identify, in ac-
cordance with federal guidelines, the intrastate revenues subject to the universal  service surcharge
based on any one of the following:
(A) The inverse of the interstate safe harbor percentage established by the Federal  Communi-
cations Commission for interconnected voice over internet  protocol service for federal universal
service contribution purposes, as the interstate safe harbor percentage may  be revised from time to
time;
(B) A traffic study  specific to the interconnected voice over internet protocol service provider
that allocates revenues between federal and state jurisdictions; or
(C) Another methodology for accurately apportioning interconnected voice over internet proto-
col service revenues between federal and state jurisdictions.
(d) For any service provider subject  to the universal service surcharge that provides, to multiple
locations, shared simultaneous voice channel capacity configured to provide local dial in  different
states, the revenue subject to the surcharge shall be only the portion  of the shared capacity in this
state as identified:
(A) By information itemizing, on the billing  statements provided to customers, the charges sub-
ject to the surcharge, as may be identified  by individual end-user location, the total number of end
users and the number of end users at each end-user location; or
(B) If  information described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph does not exist, by the service
provider’s billing system books and records.
(e) Unless otherwise provided by the Public Utility Commission by rule,  the universal service
surcharge must be a uniform percentage of the sale of services subject to the surcharge  in an
amount sufficient to  support the purposes of the universal service fund established under subsection
(1) of this section, provided that the percentage does not  exceed six percent of the sale of services
subject to the surcharge.
(f) The universal service surcharge  may be listed by a telecommunications carrier as a separate
line item in  billing statements provided to customers, as prescribed by the commission by rule or
order. The commission may not prescribe whether, or the manner  by which, a commercial mobile
radio services provider or an interconnected voice over  internet protocol services provider may list
the surcharge in billing statements provided to customers.
(g) A service provider required to collect the universal service surcharge shall:
(A) Transmit amounts collected pursuant to this section to the commission in accordance with
a schedule adopted by the commission; and
(B) Provide the commission with information requested  by the commission as necessary for the
commission to implement this section.
(5) The commission shall deposit moneys transmitted to the commission pursuant  to subsection
(4) of this section in the universal service fund established under subsection (1) of this section.
(6) The universal service fund established under subsection (1) of this section  is separate and
distinct from the General Fund. The universal service fund shall consist of all  universal service
surcharge moneys collected by service providers required to collect the surcharge and transmitted
to the commission for deposit in the universal service  fund. The universal service fund may be used
only for the  purposes described in this section and for payment of expenses incurred by the com-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1603 (SB 1603-INTRO) Page 5
mission or a third party appointed by the commission  to administer this section. All moneys in the
universal service fund are continuously  appropriated to the commission to carry out the provisions
of this section. Interest on moneys deposited in the universal service fund  shall accrue to the uni-
versal service fund.
(7) A pay telephone provider may apply to the commission, on a form developed  by the com-
mission, for a refund of the universal service surcharge imposed on the pay telephone provider under
subsection (4) of this section for the provision of pay telephone service.
(8) Nothing in this section is intended to grant the  commission the authority to impose any re-
quirement or condition, or to exercise  any regulatory authority, with respect to commercial mobile
radio services or interconnected voice over internet protocol services other than as expressly  pro-
vided for in this section.
SECTION 4.
The Broadband Fund is established, separate and distinct  from the General
Fund. Interest earned by the  Broadband Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the
Broadband Fund are continuously appropriated to the  Oregon Business Development De-
partment to be used only for providing grants or loans through, or for administering, the
Oregon Broadband Office and the program established by  rule under section 5 of this 2020
special session Act. The fund shall consist of moneys deposited in the  fund pursuant to ORS
759.425.
SECTION 5.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Underserved area” means, based on the most recent broadband  deployment data
published by the Federal Communications Commission,  other federal agencies or the State
of Oregon, a geographic area within one or more census blocks,  within which there is no
service provider offering residential wireline or wireless broadband service at  a speed of at
least 25 megabits per second for downloads and three megabits per second for uploads.
(b) “Unserved area” means, based on the most recent broadband  deployment data pub-
lished by the Federal Communications  Commission, other federal agencies or the State of
Oregon, a geographic area within one or more census blocks, within which  there is no ser-
vice provider offering residential wireline or wireless broadband service at a speed  of at least
10 megabits per second for downloads and one megabit per second for uploads.
(2)(a) The Oregon Business  Development Department shall establish by rule a program
for providing grants or loans to assist eligible applicants with projects for:
(A) The planning and development of broadband service infrastructure;
(B) Digital literacy including cybersecurity;
(C) Digital inclusion; and
(D) Digital adoption.
(b) In establishing the program required by this section, the department shall take  into
consideration all federal funding opportunities for the planning and development of
broadband service infrastructure and shall endeavor to administer the program  in a manner
that serves to maximize the total available state and federal support for  broadband develop-
ment and related planning.
(3) Rules  adopted under this section shall include but need not be limited to rules estab-
lishing:
(a) Criteria for applications and for establishing the eligibility  of applicants and proposed
projects for a grant or loan under the program;
(b) A process for:
(A) Identifying broadband service providers that provide service  within or near the ge-
ographic area that would be benefited by a project proposed by an eligible applicant; and
(B) Notifying the identified broadband service providers of the pending application;
(c) Standards for the department to evaluate applications from eligible applicants;
(d) Criteria and procedures for broadband service providers to  engage in a competitive
bidding process for contracts to complete projects pursuant to a grant or loan awarded under
the program;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1603 (SB 1603-INTRO) Page 6
(e) Reporting requirements  by grant or loan award recipients on the broadband service
infrastructure developed or planned for using grant  or loan moneys and the locations served
or that will be served by the broadband service infrastructure;
(f) A public process for interested persons to submit comments on pending applications;
(g) A process for appealing grant or loan decisions by the department; and
(h) Procedures to ensure that any records or data submitted to the  department pursuant
to administration of the program that relate to  broadband, voice connections or sub-
scriptions and that are  confidential, privileged or otherwise protected from disclosure are
not disclosed, except as permitted by state and federal law.
(4) In making broadband service infrastructure grant or loan award  decisions under the
program, the department shall apply the following preferences:
(a) Regarding the geographic  area that a proposed project will serve, the department
shall:
(A) Give first preference to proposed projects that will serve unserved areas; and
(B) Give second preference to proposed projects that will serve underserved areas.
(b) Regarding the customers that a proposed project will serve, the department shall:
(A) Give first  preference to proposed projects that are eligible to receive funds from the
Connecting Oregon Schools Fund established under ORS 276A.424;
(B) Give second preference to proposed  projects that will provide broadband service ac-
cess to public libraries; and
(C) Give third preference to proposed projects that  will provide broadband service access
to residential customers.
(5) The department shall, as part of the  program, establish procedures for distributing
grant or loan funds  awarded for the purpose of providing broadband access to schools. Pro-
cedures established under this subsection  shall include procedures for transferring not more
than 20 percent of the moneys deposited  in the Broadband Fund established under section 4
of this 2020 special session Act each biennium from the Broadband Fund  to the Connecting
Oregon Schools Fund established under ORS 276A.424.
(6) The department  may not award a grant or loan under the program for a proposed
project to:
(a) Develop broadband service  infrastructure to serve residential locations that, at the
time the application for  the proposed project is received by the department, have access to
terrestrial wireline or wireless broadband service at a speed of at least 25 megabits  per sec-
ond for downloads and three megabits per second for uploads; or
(b) Develop broadband service infrastructure that will serve two or fewer  residential lo-
cations.
(7)(a) If the department awards a grant  or loan for a proposed project to develop
broadband service infrastructure that will  serve nonresidential locations that, at the time
the application for the proposed  project was received by the department, were served by
terrestrial wireline or  wireless broadband service at a speed of at least 25 megabits per sec-
ond for downloads and three megabits per second for uploads, the broadband service  provid-
ers identified pursuant to rules adopted under subsection (3)(b) of this section shall be
afforded a right  of first refusal to contract for the development of broadband service
infrastructure as part of the project.  If a broadband service provider exercises the right of
first refusal, the provider shall be awarded the contract to develop broadband  service
infrastructure as part of the project,  subject to the requirement that the provider must offer
access to the completed broadband service infrastructure:
(A) Beginning no later than one year after the date that  the department awards the
grant or loan to develop the proposed project;
(B) At demonstrated download and upload speeds equal to  or faster than the speeds in-
dicated in the application for the proposed project; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1603 (SB 1603-INTRO) Page 7
(C) At a  cost that is equal to or less than the cost indicated in the application for the
proposed project.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a grant or  loan award for a proposed project de-
scribed in subsection (4)(b) of this section.
SECTION 6. (1) Not later than September 15 of each year,  the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department shall report, in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, to an interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly related to telecommunications  on the status of the
Broadband Fund established under section 4 of this 2020 special session Act. The report re-
quired by this section shall include a description of:
(a) All loans and grants provided through  the program adopted under section 5 of this
2020 special session Act; and
(b) The status of the projects funded by the loans and grants.
(2) In addition to the information required in the report under subsection (1) of  this
section, the report submitted on or before September 15, 2024,  by the department pursuant
to this section shall  include an evaluation of the continuing need for the Broadband Fund,
including but not limited to recommendations regarding the repeal, by section  9 of this 2020
special session Act, of the Broadband Fund and the program adopted under section 5 of  this
2020 special session Act.
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding the amount provided  for in ORS 759.425 (1)(b) and the per-
centage provided for in ORS 759.425 (4)(e), until December  31, 2021, the amount of moneys
deposited annually in the universal service fund to  be used to ensure basic telephone service
shall be as  provided for in Appendix A to Public Utility Commission Order No. 16-093, as
corrected by Public Utility Commission Order No. 16-102.
SECTION 8.  ORS 285A.160 is amended to read:
285A.160. The Oregon Broadband Advisory  Council , in consultation with the Oregon
Broadband Office, shall submit a report by  November 1 of each even-numbered year to the Joint
Legislative Committee on Information Management and Technology on the following subjects:
(1) The affordability and accessibility of broadband technology in all areas of this state;
(2) The extent of broadband technology use in this state in  business, health care, energy man-
agement, education and government; and
(3) The role of broadband technology in local, state and regional economies and economic de-
velopment.
SECTION 9.
(1) Sections 4, 5 and 6 of this 2020 special session Act are repealed on Jan-
uary 2, 2030.
(2) Any moneys in the Broadband  Fund established under section 4 of this 2020 special
session Act that are unexpended and unobligated on January 2, 2030, revert to the  universal
service fund established under ORS 759.425.
SECTION 10. The amendments to ORS 759.425 by section 3 of this 2020 special session
Act become operative on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 11. (1) Sections 4 to 7 of this 2020 special session Act and  the amendments to
ORS 285A.160, 759.400 and 759.425 by sections 1, 2  and 8 of this 2020 special session Act be-
come operative on January 1, 2021.
(2) The Public Utility Commission and the Oregon Business Development  Department
may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section that
is necessary to enable the commission and the department to  exercise, on and after the op-
erative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the commission and the department by sections  4 to 7 of this 2020 special ses-
sion Act and the amendments  to ORS 285A.160, 759.400 and 759.425 by sections 1, 2 and 8 of
this 2020 special session Act.
SECTION 12. This 2020 special session Act takes effect on the 91st day after the  date on
which the 2020 special session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1603 (SB 1603-INTRO) Page 8
Passed by Senate June 26, 2020
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2020
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1603 (SB 1603-INTRO) Page 9